District of Columbia statutes.
22-3056

Affirmative defenses.

It shall be an affirmative defense to a violation of § 22-3052, § 22-3053, or § 22-3054 if the disclosure or publication of a sexual image is made in the public interest, including the reporting of unlawful conduct, the lawful and common practices of law enforcement, or legal proceedings.

May 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-275, § 7, 62 DCR 16